Massachusetts, session 194th, S92.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 94I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "commission." the following:-
The Commission may revoke or suspend a medical use marijuana license to investigate a
medical use marijuana licensee who illegally sells medical use marijuana, or if they have been
diagnosed with cannabis use disorder by healthcare professional.
of 1